Utah statutes.
51-8-602.   Application to existing institutional funds.
(1)  This chapter applies to institutional funds existing on or established
after April 30, 2007.
(2)  As applied to institutional funds existing on April 30, 2007, this
chapter governs only decisions made or actions taken after that date.
